Nevada, session 83, AB87.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State General
Fund to the Wildlife Crossings Account created by NRS 408.656
the sum of $5,000,000 to design, construct and identify new wildlife
crossings and other related highway features to improve
permeability for wildlife in this State.
Sec. 2. This act becomes effective upon passage and approval.
H
-
*AB87*